Hawaii statutes.
PART XV.
PENALTIES AND PROCEDURE ON ARREST;

RESPECTIVE
POWERS OF STATE AND COUNTIES

Note

Part heading amended by L 1978, c 111, §1.

Cross References

Trauma system surcharge, see §291C-2.

§291C-161 Penalties. (a) It is a
violation for any person to violate any of the provisions of this chapter,
except as otherwise specified in subsections (c) and (d) and unless the
violation is by other law of this State declared to be a felony, misdemeanor,
or petty misdemeanor.

(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and
(d), every person who is determined to have violated any provision of this
chapter for which another penalty is not provided shall be fined:

(1) Not more than $200 for a first violation thereof;

(2) Not more than $300 for a second violation
committed within one year after the date of the first violation; and

(3) Not more than $500 for a third or subsequent
violation committed within one year after the date of the first violation.

(c) Every person convicted under or found in
violation of section 291C-12, 291C-12.5, 291C-12.6, 291C-13, 291C-14, 291C-15,
291C-16, 291C-72, 291C-73, 291C-95, 291C-102, 291C-103, 291C-104, or 291C-105
shall be sentenced or fined in accordance with those sections.

(d) Every person who violates section 291C-13
or 291C-18 shall:

(1) Be fined not more than $200 or imprisoned not
more than ten days for a first conviction thereof;

(2) Be fined not more than $300 or imprisoned not
more than twenty days or both for conviction of a second offense committed
within one year after the date of the first offense; and

(3) Be fined not more than $500 or imprisoned not
more than six months or both for conviction of a third or subsequent offense
committed within one year after the date of the first offense.

(e) The court may assess a sum not to exceed
$50 for the cost of issuing a penal summons upon any person who fails to appear
at the place within the time specified in the citation issued to the person for
any traffic violation.

(f) The court may require a person who violates
any of the provisions of this chapter to attend a course of instruction in
driver retraining as deemed appropriate by the court, in addition to any other
penalties imposed. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; am L 1976, c 44, §1; am L 1978, c
222, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1992, c 243, §6; am L 1993, c 214, §15; am L 1994, c
33, §1; am L 1996, c 169, §4; am L 1998, c 265, §2; am L 1999, c 297, §3; am L
2006, c 129, §5; am L 2007, c 69, §1 and c 125, §3 ; am L 2008, c 231, §19]

Case Notes

As subsection (c) requires every person convicted under
§291C-105 to be sentenced in accordance with §291C-105, trial court erred in
sentencing defendant to a six-month driver's license suspension under §286-125;
the plain language of §291C-105 required the sentencing court to impose the
list of sanctions as specific under §291C-105(c), including a thirty-day
license suspension for a first-time offender. 121 H. 117 (App.), 214 P.3d 1107
(2009).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next